Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-2281
Grants; amount.

(1) The department shall make annual grants in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars.

(2) As a condition to receiving a grant, an applicant shall obtain at least ten percent matching funds from local sources.

Laws 2000, LB 1101, § 10;

Laws 2017, LB417, § 22.